Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
454M

MORTGAGE
SERVICERS

Section

454M-1 Definitions

454M-2 License required

454M-2.5 Unlicensed foreclosure actions voided

454M-3 Exemptions

454M-4 License; fees; renewals; notices; voluntary
surrender

of license; bonds

454M-4.5 Registration with NMLS

454M-5 Additional duties of a mortgage servicer; good
faith

and fair dealing; disclosures; payments,
accounting,

and records; assignment of servicing
rights

454M-5.5 Residential mortgage loan delinquencies
and loss

mitigation efforts

454M-6 Prohibited activities

454M-7 License sanctions; suspension, revocation,
denial,

condition, and refusal to renew,
reinstate, or restore

454M-8 Powers of commissioner

454M-8.5 Investigation and examination authority

454M-9 Private right of action

454M-10 Penalty

454M-11 Compliance resolution fund

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next